apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
<pardef n="breacmh/ias__n">
  <e><p><l>ias-s</l>     <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ias-s</l>     <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ias-sa</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ias-sa</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ias</l>       <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ias</l>       <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iasa-s</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iasa-s</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iasa</l>      <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iasa</l>      <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iasasa</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iasasa</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éise-s</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éise</l>      <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>éisese</l>    <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="breacria/sc__n">
  <e><p><l>isc</l>       <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sc-s</l>      <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sc-s</l>      <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sc-s</l>      <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sc</l>        <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sc</l>        <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sca-s</l>     <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sca-s</l>     <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sca</l>       <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>sca</l>       <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>scasa</l>     <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>scasa</l>     <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>scsa</l>      <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>scsa</l>      <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>scsa</l>      <r>sc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="br/eall__n">
  <e><p><l>eall-s</l>    <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eall-s</l>    <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eall</l>      <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eall</l>      <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ealla-s</l>   <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ealla-s</l>   <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ealla</l>     <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ealla</l>     <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eallasa</l>   <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eallasa</l>   <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eallsa</l>    <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="weak"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eallsa</l>    <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ille-s</l>    <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>ille</l>      <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>illese</l>    <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="breischá/in__n">
  <e><p><l>in-s</l>      <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>inse</l>      <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nach-s</l>    <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nach</l>      <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nacha-s</l>   <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nacha-s</l>   <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nacha-s</l>   <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nacha</l>     <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nacha</l>     <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nacha</l>     <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nachasa</l>   <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nachasa</l>   <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nachasa</l>   <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>nachsa</l>    <r>in<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="breith/eamh__n">
  <e><p><l>eamh-s</l>    <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eamh</l>      <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>eamhsa</l>    <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>imh-s</l>     <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>imh</l>       <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>imhse</l>     <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iúna-s</l>    <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iúna-s</l>    <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iúna</l>      <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iúna</l>      <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iúnasa</l>    <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>iúnasa</l>    <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="strong"/><s n="gen"/><s n="emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="breacmhias"><i>breacmh</i><par n="breacmh/ias__n"/></e>
<e lm="breacriasc"><i>breacria</i><par n="breacria/sc__n"/></e>
<e lm="breall"><i>br</i><par n="br/eall__n"/></e>
<e lm="breischáin"><i>breischá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="breitheamh"><i>breith</i><par n="breith/eamh__n"/></e>
<e lm="bruinneall"><i>bruinn</i><par n="br/eall__n"/></e>
<e lm="coróin"><i>coró</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="craein"><i>crae</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="cráin"><i>crá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="cáin"><i>cá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="cíoscháin"><i>cíoschá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="cúlriasc"><i>cúlria</i><par n="breacria/sc__n"/></e>
<e lm="dearg-ghráin"><i>dearg-ghrá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="draein"><i>drae</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="fomhias"><i>fomh</i><par n="breacmh/ias__n"/></e>
<e lm="forcháin"><i>forchá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="gráin"><i>grá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="inneoin"><i>inneo</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="leathchoróin"><i>leathchoró</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="mias"><i>m</i><par n="breacmh/ias__n"/></e>
<e lm="otharthraein"><i>otharthrae</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="post-traein"><i>post-trae</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="riasc"><i>ria</i><par n="breacria/sc__n"/></e>
<e lm="spéirbhruinneall"><i>spéirbhruinn</i><par n="br/eall__n"/></e>
<e lm="traein"><i>trae</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
<e lm="urghráin"><i>urghrá</i><par n="breischá/in__n"/></e>
